Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.067

Effect of failure to make appointment.

Whenever appointments under RCW 36.93.051 through * 36.93.065 have not been made by the appointing authority, the size of the board shall be considered to be reduced by one member for each position that remains vacant or unappointed.

[ 1989 c 84 s 21.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 36.93.065 was repealed by 1999 c 124 s 1.